District of Columbia statutes.
11-1903

Prohibition of discrimination.

A citizen of the District of Columbia may not be excluded or disqualified from jury service as a grand or petit juror in the District of Columbia on account of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, economic status, marital status, age, or (except as provided in this chapter) physical handicap.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.
1981 Ed., § 11-1903.
This section is referenced in § 11-1908.